Hawaii statutes.
§291C-38 Longitudinal traffic lane
markings. (a) Traffic lane markings shall be yellow, white or red in
color. Black may be used in combination with these colors where the pavement
itself does not provide sufficient contrast.

(b) Lane markings shall conform to the
following concepts:

(1) White lines indicate the separation of lanes of
traffic flowing in the same direction.

(2) Yellow lines indicate the separation of lanes of
traffic flowing in opposing directions or the left boundary of a traffic lane
at a particularly hazardous location.

(3) Red markings indicate a roadway that shall not be
entered or used by the viewer of those markings.

(4) Broken lines are permissive in character.

(5) Solid lines are restrictive in character.

(6) A wider line indicates a greater degree of
emphasis.

(7) Double lines indicate maximum restriction.

(8) Markings which require visible emphasis at night
shall be reflectorized.

(c) Longitudinal traffic lane markings shall
have the following applications:

(1) A broken white line is used to indicate the edge
of the traffic lane where travel is permitted in the same direction on both
sides of the line and may be crossed by vehicular traffic when the crossing can
be made with safety.

(2) A broken yellow line is used to indicate the left
edge of a traffic lane where traffic on the other side of the line moves in the
opposite direction and may be crossed by vehicular traffic only when overtaking
or passing a vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when executing a left
turn and then only if the movement can be made with safety and does not
interfere with traffic moving in the opposite direction.

(3) A solid white line is used to indicate the edge
of the traffic lane where travel in the same direction is permitted on both
sides of the line but where movement from lane to lane is considered to be
hazardous. A solid white line may be crossed only in unusual circumstances and
then only with great care. A double width solid white line is used to
emphasize a greater degree of hazard.

(4) A solid white line is also used to indicate the
right edge of the pavement.

(5) A double solid white line is used to indicate the
edges of traffic lanes where travel in the same direction is permitted on both
sides of the double line but where movement from lane to lane is considered to
be dangerous. The crossing of a double solid white line by vehicular traffic
is prohibited.

(6) A solid yellow line is used to indicate the left
edge of a traffic lane where overtaking and passing on the left is prohibited.
The crossing of a solid yellow line by vehicular traffic is prohibited except
when the crossing is part of a left turn movement.

(7) A solid yellow line is also used to indicate the
left edge of each roadway of a divided street or highway.

(8) A double solid yellow line is used to indicate
the separation between lanes of traffic moving in opposite directions. The
crossing of a double solid yellow line by vehicular traffic is prohibited
except when the crossing is part of a left turn movement.

(9) A double line consisting of a broken yellow line
and a solid yellow line is used to indicate a separation between lanes of
traffic moving in opposite directions and vehicular traffic adjacent to the
broken line is permitted to overtake or pass if the movement can be made with
safety and does not interfere with traffic moving in the opposite direction.
The crossing of this double line by vehicular traffic adjacent to the solid
line is prohibited except when the crossing is part of a left turn movement.

(10) A double broken yellow line is used to indicate
the edge of a reversible traffic lane where the direction of the vehicular
traffic may be changed from time to time.

(11) A dotted line is used to indicate the extension
of a line through an intersection or interchange. It shall be the same color
as the line it extends. The crossing of a dotted line by vehicular traffic is
subject to the same prohibitions and exceptions as are applicable to the line
it extends.

(12) A solid white line when supplemented by official
signs or pavement markings, is used to indicate the separation of bicycle lanes
from lanes of vehicular traffic flowing in the same direction. Except as
allowed under section 291C-123, vehicles other than bicycles shall be prohibited
from operating in a bicycle lane. [L 1973, c 202, §1; am L 1975, c 22, §3; am L
1978, c 39, §2; am L 1999, c 263, §4; am L 2002, c 58, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next